District of Columbia statutes.
47-1805.02a

Combined reporting required.

(a)

For tax years beginning after December 31, 2010, a taxpayer engaged in a unitary business with one or more other persons that are part of a water’s-edge combined group reporting pursuant to § 47-1810.07 shall file a combined report, which includes the income, determined under § 47-1810.04 and § 47-1810.05 and the allocation and apportionment factors determined under § 47-1810.02 and the pertinent regulations of all such persons that are members of the unitary business, and other information as required by the Chief Financial Officer. If a worldwide combined reporting election has been made, the taxpayer shall file a combined report that includes such income and factors of all the persons that are members of the unitary business, and any other information as required by the Chief Financial Officer.

(b)

The Chief Financial Officer may require, by regulation, a combined report to include the income and associated apportionment factors of any persons that are not included pursuant to subsection (a) of this section but that are members of a unitary business to reflect proper apportionment of income of the entire unitary business.

(c)

If the Chief Financial Officer determines that the reported income or loss of a taxpayer engaged in a unitary business with any person not included represents an avoidance or evasion of tax by the taxpayer, the Chief Financial Officer may require, on a case-by-case basis, that all or any part of the income and associated apportionment factors be included in the taxpayer’s combined report.

(d)

With respect to inclusion of associated apportionment factors pursuant to this section, the Chief Financial Officer may require the exclusion of any one or more of the factors, the inclusion of one or more additional factors, that will fairly represent the taxpayer’s business activity in the District, or the employment of any other method to effectuate a proper reflection of the total amount of income subject to apportionment and an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer’s income.

(e)

The Chief Financial Officer shall adopt regulations as necessary to implement combined reporting and to ensure that the tax liability or net income of any taxpayer whose income derived from or is attributable to sources within the District that is required to be determined by a combined report pursuant to § 47-1810.02 or § 47-1810.07 and of each entity included in the combined report, both during and after the period of inclusion in the combined report, is properly reported, determined, computed, assessed, collected, or adjusted.

(f)

The Chief Financial Officer shall adopt regulations as necessary prescribing the form and manner of all returns and reports required under this section, including the time, place, and extension of such returns and reports.

(g)

Any taxpayer election made under § 47-1805.02(5)(C) and the pertinent regulations to file a consolidated return is revoked for tax years beginning after December 31, 2010.

History

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 8002(c), 58 DCR 6226
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7102(c), 60 DCR 12472

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-1801.04 and § 47-1810.07.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote the section.

Temporary Legislation

Section 302(c) of D.C. Law 19-226 amended this section to read as follows:
“§ 47-1805.02a. Combined reporting required.
“(a) For tax years beginning on and after December 31, 2010, a taxpayer engaged in a unitary business with one or more other persons that are part of a water’s-edge combined group reporting pursuant to § 47-1810.07(a) shall file a combined report, which includes the income, determined under § 47-1810.04 and § 47-1810.05 and the allocation and apportionment factors determined under § 47-1810.02 and the pertinent regulations of all such persons that are members of the unitary business, and other information as required by the Chief Financial Officer. If a worldwide combined reporting election has been made, the taxpayer shall file a combined report that includes such income and factors of all the persons that are members of the unitary business, and any other information as required by the Chief Financial Officer.
“(b) The Chief Financial Officer may, by regulation, require a combined report to include the income and associated apportionment factors of any persons that are not included pursuant to subsection (a) of this section but that are members of a unitary business to reflect proper apportionment of income of the entire unitary business.
“(c) If the Chief Financial Officer determines that the reported income or loss of a taxpayer engaged in a unitary business with any person not included represents an avoidance or evasion of tax by the taxpayer, the Chief Financial Officer may, on a case-by-case basis, require that all or any part of the income and associated apportionment factors be included in the taxpayer’s combined report.
“(d) With respect to inclusion of associated apportionment factors pursuant to this section, the Chief Financial Officer may require the exclusion of any one or more of the factors, the inclusion of one or more additional factors, which will fairly represent the taxpayer’s business activity in the District, or the employment of any other method to effectuate a proper reflection of the total amount of income subject to apportionment and an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer’s income.
“(e) The Chief Financial Officer shall adopt regulations as necessary to ensure that the tax liability or net income of any taxpayer whose income derived from or attributable to sources within the District that is required to be determined by a combined report pursuant to § 47-1810.02 or § 47-1810.07 and of each entity included in the combined report, both during and after the period of inclusion in the combined report, is properly reported, determined, computed, assessed, collected, or adjusted.
“(f) The Chief Financial Officer shall adopt regulations as necessary prescribing the form and manner of all returns and reports required under § 47.1805.02a [sic], including the time, place and extension of such returns and reports.
“(g) Any taxpayer election made under § 47.1805.02(5)(C) and the pertinent regulations to file a consolidated return is revoked for tax years beginning after December 31, 2010.”
Section 303 of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that § 302 of the act shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 302(c) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478), applicable for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 302(c) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-604, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1045), applicable for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 7102(c) and 7103 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 7102(c) and 7103 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7101 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Combined Reporting Clarification Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Sections 8003 and 8004 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided:

“Sec. 8003. Review of impact of combined reporting.

“After 2 full years of tax reporting have occurred under the combined reporting requirements imposed by section 8002, the Chief Financial Officer shall determine the economic effects of these requirements on affected taxpayers.

“Sec. 8004. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.”

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 7103 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that § 7102 of the act shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.